Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-947
Contempt of court.

Any person who, after being ordered by a court to comply with a subpoena issued under the False Medicaid Claims Act, fails in whole or in part to testify or to produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, shall be in contempt of court as if the failure was committed in the presence of the court. The court may assess a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars for each day such person fails to comply. No person shall be found to be in contempt of court nor shall any fine be assessed if compliance with such subpoena violates such person's right against self-incrimination.

Laws 2004, LB 1084, § 14;

R.S.Supp.,2004, § 68-1086;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 47.